Tennessee statutes. Title 45 Banks And Financial Institutions
Part 2

Organization of Banks

45-2-201. Incorporators — Applicant requirements.

A corporation seeking to conduct a banking business in Tennessee may be organized by five (5) or more incorporators, a majority of whom shall be residents of this state. The incorporators shall complete the process provided in this part and as outlined in subsection (c).

Each incorporator shall subscribe and pay in full, in cash, for common stock in a minimum amount as determined by the commissioner.

In order to provide for the organization of the business authorized to conduct banking business in Tennessee, applicants shall complete the following:

Submit a notice of intention and request for issuance of a charter for a corporation seeking to conduct banking business in Tennessee to be filed with the secretary of state as provided in § 45-2-202;

Submit and complete an application for charter, as provided in § 45-2-204; and

Submit and complete an application for certificate of authority, as provided in § 45-2-212.

For purposes of this part, a bank may be organized as a corporation as provided in title 48, chapters 11-27 or as a limited liability company as provided in title 48, chapters 201-249 and as outlined in § 45-2-220.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.304); T.C.A., § 45-201; Acts 1996, ch. 768, § 5; 2006, ch. 660, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1996, ch. 768, which amended this section, is known and may be cited as the Bank Reform Act of 1996.

Acts 2006, ch. 660, § 6 provided that the act shall not apply to any notice of intention filed on or after May 12, 2006.

Cross-References. Conversion of financial institutions, title 45, ch. 11.

45-2-202. Notice of intention — Request for issuance of charter — Approval or nonapproval of notice of intention or request for issuance of charter and accompanying documents — Notice — Filing — Restriction on acceptance of shares of capital stock until notice of approval received.

The incorporators shall file with the commissioner a notice of their intention to organize a corporation seeking authority to become a state bank, signed by each of the incorporators. The notice shall state the following and other information that the commissioner may require:

The name, residence and occupation of each incorporator, and the amount of stock subscribed and paid for by each;

The name and address of an individual within the state to whom notice to all incorporators may be sent;

The total capital, the number of shares of each class and series, the par value of the shares of each class and series of the corporation and a copy of the stockholder offering circular and subscription agreement. For purposes of Tennessee law, any securities with different voting, distribution, or liquidation rights or preferences shall be deemed to be securities of different classes;

Whether it is intended that the proposed state bank shall have trust powers;

The community in which the proposed state bank is to be headquartered;

The proposed name of the institution, which, in the commissioner's judgment, is not likely to cause confusion to the affected public. The incorporators shall use the phrase “in organization” after the proposed bank's name, until such time as the certificate of authority has been issued;

A statement of the method of financing and amount of organizational expense fund as required in § 45-2-203;

A copy of the escrow agreement; and

The filing fee required by the secretary of state.

The incorporators may also file with the commissioner a request for issuance of charter for a corporation seeking to conduct banking business in Tennessee, accompanied by an executed charter. The executed charter filed with the commissioner shall be in the form the commissioner prescribes, containing the following information:

The name of the state bank;

If the state bank is to exercise trust powers, a statement to that effect;

The community in which the main office is to be located;

The amount of capital, the number of shares of each class and series, the relative preferences, powers and rights of each class and series, the par value of the shares of each class and series, if any, and the amount of the paid-in surplus; and

Any other proper provisions to govern the business and affairs of the state bank that may be desired by the incorporators, including, but not limited to, the initial directors of the proposed state bank.

If the notice of intention, request for issuance of charter or any accompanying documents do not comply with the requirements of this section, the commissioner shall, within ten (10) business days after receipt, either:

Notify the incorporators that the notice of intention, request for issuance of charter and accompanying documents are approved as to form pending the receipt of any additional information requested of the applicant in the notice; or

Notify the incorporators that the notice of intention, request for issuance of charter and accompanying documents, have not been accepted, calling attention to the defect or defects in the documents. The incorporators may resubmit the notice of intention, proposed charter or accompanying documents, revised as necessary, to address the defect or defects noted by the commissioner.

The commissioner shall have five (5) business days after receipt of the revised notice of intention, request for issuance of charter and accompanying documents to review the notice, request and documents and either:

Notify the incorporators that the revised notice of intention, request for issuance of charter and accompanying documents are approved as to form; or

Notify the incorporators that the notice of intention, request for issuance of charter and accompanying documents have not been accepted, calling attention to the defect or defects still in the documents.

If the revised notice of intention, request for issuance of charter and accompanying documents are not accepted, any subsequent filing by the incorporators for the proposed bank shall be as if it were an initial filing.

If the commissioner does not refuse to accept the notice of intention and request for issuance of charter or revised notice of intention and revised request for issuance of charter within the time provided, they shall be deemed to be approved as to form.

After the notice of intention and request for issuance of charter for a corporation seeking to conduct banking business in Tennessee is accepted for filing or deemed to have been filed with the commissioner, the commissioner shall authorize the filing of the executed charter by endorsing approval on all copies thereof and filing the originally executed charter with the secretary of state, retaining one (1) copy for the department's files and returning one (1) copy to the incorporators within ten (10) business days thereafter, so that the incorporators may take any further steps necessary to duly incorporate the proposed new state bank as a corporate entity. However, the commissioner shall retain the right to require any amendment to the charter or disallow any proposed officer or director of the proposed new bank prior to granting a certificate of authority. Nothing in this subsection (d) shall prevent the commissioner from otherwise rejecting the application or refusing to grant a certificate of authority.

It is a Class C misdemeanor, under this chapter and chapter 1 of this title, to accept any stock subscription for shares of capital stock of the proposed bank from any persons other than the incorporators until the incorporators have received the notification from the commissioner that the notice of intention and accompanying documents are approved as to form, or in violation of any order of the commissioner. Any subscription for capital stock of the proposed bank accepted in violation of this subsection (e) shall be enforceable by the commissioner and only to the extent the commissioner determines it to be necessary to protect investors.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.305); 1973, ch. 294, § 6; T.C.A., § 45-202; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1996, ch. 768, §§ 6, 7; 2001, ch. 54, § 5; 2006, ch. 660, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1996, ch. 768, which amended this section, is known and may be cited as the Bank Reform Act of 1996.

Acts 2006, ch. 660, § 6 provided that the act shall not apply to any notice of intention filed on or after May 12, 2006.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Violations of banking laws, title 45, ch. 2, part 17.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Banks and Banking, § 5.

45-2-203. Organizational expenses.

Organizational expenses shall not be paid from capital or surplus funds of the bank without the prior written consent of the commissioner.

Prior to filing the notice of intent, the incorporators shall subscribe for shares of the corporation seeking to conduct banking business in Tennessee in an amount the commissioner deems adequate to pay the organizational expenses of the proposed bank.

The expense fund shall be used for expenses incurred by the incorporators in connection with the organization of the proposed bank. Subscriptions paid by the incorporators for their shares in the proposed bank may be used to pay organizational expenses, but, in that case, shall not be commingled with funds in any account in which any non-incorporator funds have been or are to be deposited.

Payment from the expense fund for payment of broker commissions to secure subscriptions to stock shall not be permitted without prior written consent of the commissioner.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.306); 1973, ch. 294, § 6; 1977, ch. 35, § 1; T.C.A., § 45-203; Acts 2006, ch. 660, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006, ch. 660, § 6 provided that the act shall not apply to any notice of intention filed on or after May 12, 2006.

Cross-References. Applicability to industrial banks, §45-5-607.

45-2-204. Application for charter — Acceptance, nonacceptance and filing of application — Notice to other banks — Formation of interim bank.

After the incorporators have received notification from the commissioner that the notice of intention and other accompanying documents are approved as to form, the incorporators or, after the charter has been filed, the corporation seeking authority to conduct banking business in Tennessee, may file an application and request for charter, if not previously requested, with the commissioner. The incorporators shall submit the following, if not previously filed with the commissioner:

The information required by the commissioner in § 45-2-202(b);

The application fee required by the commissioner;

Proposed bylaws in the form the commissioner prescribes; and

An application in the form and containing the information the commissioner requires, including the following:

The name, residence and occupation of each subscriber from whom subscriptions have been accepted as of the date the application is filed, and the number of shares for which each subscriber has subscribed, which list shall be updated not less than every thirty (30) business days to add all additional subscribers and any amendments to any information previously filed;

The past and present connection with any bank, other than as a customer on terms generally available to the public, of each director and each subscriber to more than ten percent (10%) of the capital stock, updated as necessary to identify subscribers not previously identified in the application; and

The address at which it is proposed that the state bank do business, or, if the address is not known, the area within the community in which it is proposed that the business be located.

If the application, the proposed charter or any other accompanying documents do not comply with the requirements of this chapter and chapter 1 of this title, the commissioner shall, within twenty (20) business days after the receipt thereof, either:

Return them to the incorporators, calling attention to the defect or defects therein; or

Notify the incorporators of the rejection of the application, calling attention to the defect or defects therein.

If the application, proposed charter and accompanying documents, if any, are not so returned or rejected by the commissioner within twenty (20) business days of the receipt thereof, they shall be deemed to have been filed with the commissioner.

Should the application be rejected or should a certificate of authority not be granted, the commissioner shall give appropriate notice to the secretary of state. The incorporators shall either:

Return the original charter to the commissioner and take the steps that are necessary to dissolve the proposed state bank as a corporate entity as provided in the Tennessee Business Corporation Act, compiled in title 48, chapters 11-27; provided, that all subscription proceeds, except those proceeds made by incorporators to establish an organizational expense fund as provided in § 45-2-203, shall be returned to all subscribers in accordance with the subscription agreement; or

Amend the original charter to rename the corporate entity and revise any other provisions as determined by the commissioner as provided in the Tennessee Business Corporation Act, compiled in title 48, chapters 11-27.

The commissioner may also require publication of the notice.

Notwithstanding this chapter and chapter 1 of this title to the contrary, the commissioner may prescribe by rule or regulation the application procedure for the formation of an interim bank to facilitate an interim bank merger, as defined in § 45-2-1402.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.307); 1973, ch. 294, § 6; 1977, ch. 36, § 1; T.C.A., § 45-204; Acts 1983, ch. 74, § 4; 1996, ch. 768, § 8; 2006, ch. 660, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1996, ch. 768, which amended this section, is known and may be cited as the Bank Reform Act of 1996.

Acts 2006, ch. 660, § 6 provided that the act shall not apply to any notice of intention filed on or after May 12, 2006.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Banks and Banking, §§ 4, 5.

Law Reviews.

State Regulation of Bank Holding Companies and the Future of Interstate Banking: A Tennessee Perspective (Colman B. Hoffman and Kathryn R. Edge), 51 Tenn. L. Rev. 383 (1984).

45-2-205. Examination of application for charter — Factors considered.

When an application for a charter has been filed with the commissioner, the commissioner shall make or cause to be made a careful investigation and examination relative to the following:

The character, reputation and financial standing of the organizers or incorporators and their motives in seeking to organize the proposed state bank;

The character, financial responsibility, banking or trust experience, and business qualifications of those proposed as officers of the bank;

The character, financial responsibility, business experiences and standing in the community of the proposed directors of the bank;

The need in the community where the bank would be located for banking, banking and trust, or trust facilities, or additional facilities of like character, giving particular consideration to the adequacy of existing banking and trust facilities;

The ability of the community to support the proposed bank, giving consideration to:

The competition offered by existing banks and other financial institutions;

The banking history of the community;

The opportunities for profitable employment of bank funds as indicated by the average demand for credit, the number of potential depositors, the volume of bank transactions, and the business and industries of the community, with particular regard to their stability, diversification and size; and

If the bank is to exercise trust powers, the opportunities for profitable employment of fiduciary services; and

Other facts and circumstances bearing on the proposed bank and its relation to the community that, in the opinion of the commissioner, may be relevant.

Within the longer of six (6) months after the filing of the application or three (3) months after the filing of a listing of subscribers showing that at least seventy-five percent (75%) of the stock has been subscribed, the commissioner shall consider the commissioner's findings and recommendations and all other relevant information available to the commissioner and shall have the discretion to approve the application, but the commissioner shall not approve the application before ascertaining to the commissioner's satisfaction that:

The public need and advantage will be promoted by the establishment of the proposed bank;

Conditions in the community in which the bank would transact business afford reasonable promise of successful operation;

The bank is being formed for no other purpose than the legitimate objects contemplated by this chapter and chapter 1 of this title;

The proposed capital and surplus are not less than the required minimum and are adequate in the light of current and prospective banking conditions;

Those proposed as officers and directors have sufficient experience, ability and standing to afford reasonable promise of successful operation; and

The applicants have complied with all applicable provisions of this chapter and chapter 1 of this title.

If the charter has not been previously granted in accordance with § 45-2-204(c), upon approval of the application, the commissioner shall grant a charter by endorsing the approval on all copies of the charter and filing one (1) copy with the secretary of state, one (1) copy with the register in the county in which the bank is located, retaining one (1) copy for the department's files and returning one (1) copy to the incorporators within twenty (20) days of the action approving the application.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.308); 1973, ch. 294, § 6; T.C.A., § 45-205; Acts 1980, ch. 620, § 2; 1996, ch. 768, § 9; 2001, ch. 54, § 6.

Compiler's Notes. Section 5 of Acts 1980, ch. 620 reads:

“The existence and operation of any trust company formed prior to the effective date of this act shall not be impaired by the enactment of this act.”

Acts 1996, ch. 768, which amended this section, is known and may be cited as the Bank Reform Act of 1996.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Banks and Banking, § 5.

Law Reviews.

State Regulation of Bank Holding Companies and the Future of Interstate Banking: A Tennessee Perspective (Colman B. Hoffman and Kathryn R. Edge), 51 Tenn. L. Rev. 383 (1984).

45-2-206. Subscription calls.

After the charter for a corporation seeking to conduct banking business in Tennessee has been filed with the secretary of state, the incorporators or, if directors have been initially appointed, the directors of the proposed state bank, may call for the payment of the subscriptions. The subscriptions shall be placed into an escrow account. The incorporators or directors, as appropriate, may not remove any funds from the escrow account prior to the issuance of the certificate of authority or upon written approval from the commissioner.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.309); T.C.A., § 45-206; Acts 1996, ch. 768, § 10; 2001, ch. 54, § 7; 2006, ch. 660, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1996, ch. 768, which amended this section, is known and may be cited as the Bank Reform Act of 1996.

Acts 2006, ch. 660, § 6 provided that the act shall not apply to any notice of intention filed on or after May 12, 2006.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Banks and Banking, § 5.

45-2-207. Capital structure.

A state bank shall have the capital structure that the commissioner deems adequate. The capital structure of an interim bank chartered pursuant to § 45-2-204(d) shall consist of amounts as determined by the commissioner and prescribed by rule or regulation.

The commissioner may require the bank to increase its capital structure to the point deemed adequate by the commissioner before granting approval of an application for a branch office, amendment to charter, change of location or trust powers.

The issuance of preferred or convertible preferred stock shall be authorized by the commissioner. The stock shall have the preferences, powers and rights the commissioner may approve. It shall not be retired without the approval of the commissioner, and the requirement of the approval shall be stated in the stock certificates, but the commissioner may give advance approval to sinking funds payable exclusively out of earnings available for dividends.

The commissioner may direct a state bank to sell additional stock in a designated amount to remedy an impairment of capital.

The commissioner may consider the value of outstanding debentures as capital for the purpose of determining the legal lending limits of the bank.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.301); 1973, ch. 294, § 6; T.C.A., § 45-207; Acts 1983, ch. 74, § 5; 1993, ch. 447, § 2; 2001, ch. 54, §§ 8, 9.

Compiler's Notes. The section as set out above reflects the version prior to the amendment of this section by Acts 1996, ch. 447, § 2. Section (13) of that act provided that that amendment expired July 1, 1996, and that the prior version was reinstated.

Cross-References. Applicability to industrial banks, §45-5-607.

Law Reviews.

Section I: Symposium - Rethinking The U.S. Regulatory Structure Governing Financial Institutions: 21st Century Solutions For a 21st Century Marketplace: When the Government Becomes a Stockholder: Impact of the Capital Purchase Program on Bank Regulation (Jackie Prester), 39 U. Mem. L. Rev. 931 (2009).

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

45-2-208. Capital notes and debentures.

Any bank, after obtaining the prior approval of the shareholders owning two-thirds (2/3) of the stock of the bank entitled to vote and after obtaining the prior approval of the commissioner, may issue and sell its convertible or nonconvertible capital notes or debentures. Capital notes or debentures that are by their terms convertible into stock may be converted into shares of common or preferred stock in accordance with the provisions therefor as may be made in the capital notes or debentures with the approval of the commissioner.

Capital notes and debentures issued by banks shall be unsecured indebtedness of the bank and shall be subordinate to the claims of all depositors and of all other creditors of the bank, regardless of whether the claims of the depositors arose before or after the issuance of the capital notes or debentures. In order to secure the payment of the capital notes or debentures, however, provisions for sinking funds may be made. In the event of liquidation, all depositors and all other creditors of the bank shall be entitled to be paid in full before payment shall be made on account of principal or interest on the capital notes or debentures. No payment shall be made at any time on account of the principal thereof unless following the payment the aggregate of the capital, surplus and undivided profits and capital notes or debentures thereafter outstanding shall be at least equal to the aggregate immediately before the original issuance of the capital notes or debentures, or as may otherwise be expressly authorized by the commissioner. The claims of holders of capital notes or debentures shall, however, be superior to the claims of stockholders for dividends or other claims on account of shares of capital stock held by them.

The amount of outstanding capital notes and debentures issued and outstanding by any bank shall be, subject to the approval of the commissioner, treated as capital for the purpose of computing the loan limits prescribed by § 45-2-1102(a) and for the purpose of computing investment limits prescribed by § 45-2-607(a)(9).

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.302); 1973, ch. 294, § 6; T.C.A., § 45-208.

Cross-References. Applicability to industrial banks, §45-5-607.

45-2-209, 45-2-210.
[Reserved.]

A state bank may provide for indemnification of its officers, directors or employees as provided in the Tennessee Business Corporation Act, compiled in title 48, chs. 11-27.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.311); T.C.A., § 45-211; Acts 1980, ch. 549, § 1; 1994, ch. 551, § 7.

Law Reviews.

National Banks — National Banks Need Not Comply With State Banking Laws When Seeking To Relocate Principal Office And Retain The Former As A Branch, 24 Vand. L. Rev. 175.

45-2-212. Application for certificate of authority — Contents.

After the applicant has received notification from the commissioner that the application for charter has been approved and subscription proceeds have been accepted and collected for at least the minimum capital of the proposed state bank as required by the commissioner, the proposed state bank shall file a request with the commissioner for the issuance of a certificate of authority, which request shall contain:

A statement that the capital and surplus have been paid in;

The name and address of each stockholder and the number of shares held by the stockholders; and

Any other information that the commissioner may require to enable the commissioner to determine whether authority to commence business should be issued.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.312); 1973, ch. 294, § 6; T.C.A., § 45-212; Acts 1996, ch. 768, § 11; 2006, ch. 660, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1996, ch. 768, which amended this section, is known and may be cited as the Bank Reform Act of 1996.

Acts 2006, ch. 660, § 6 provided that the act shall not apply to any notice of intention filed on or after May 12, 2006.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Banks and Banking, § 5.

45-2-213. Return of noncomplying applications — Effect of failure to return.

If the application for a certificate of authority or any accompanying documents do not comply with the requirements of this chapter and chapter 1 of this title, the commissioner shall, within ten (10) business days after the receipt thereof, return them to the incorporators, calling attention to the defect or defects in the application.

If the application and accompanying documents are not so returned within the ten-day period, they shall be deemed to have been filed with the commissioner.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.312); 1973, ch. 294, § 6; T.C.A., § 45-213; Acts 1996, ch. 768, § 12; 2007, ch. 29, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1996, ch. 768, which amended this section, is known and may be cited as the Bank Reform Act of 1996.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Banks and Banking, § 5.

45-2-214. Time for approval or denial of application — Conditions for approval.

The commissioner shall approve or deny the application for a certificate of authority within thirty (30) days after the application has been filed. The commissioner shall approve the application if:

The capital and surplus have been fully paid in cash;

Appropriate bylaws have been adopted;

Any conditions imposed by the commissioner in granting the charter have been fulfilled;

The requirements of this chapter and chapter 1 of this title have been satisfied; and

An amount of fidelity bond coverages satisfactory to the commissioner is in force.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.312); 1973, ch. 294, § 6; T.C.A., § 45-214; Acts 1996, ch. 768, § 13.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1996, ch. 768, which amended this section, is known and may be cited as the Bank Reform Act of 1996.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Banks and Banking, § 5.

45-2-215. Approval or denial of application — Action by commissioner — Limitation of bank or trust company to fiduciary purposes and powers.

If the commissioner approves the application, the commissioner shall promptly issue a certificate of authority and mail the same to the incorporators. If the commissioner denies the application, the commissioner shall promptly mail a notice of the denial to the incorporators, stating therein the reason or reasons for denying the application.

A state bank or trust company, for which the commissioner has approved the filing of a charter and has issued a certificate of authority, is not illegally organized because its purposes and powers are, or have been required by the commissioner to be, limited to fiduciary purposes and powers.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.312); 1973, ch. 294, § 6; T.C.A., § 45-215; Acts 1980, ch. 620, § 1; 1996, ch. 768, § 14.

Compiler's Notes. Section 5 of Acts 1980, ch. 620 read:

“The existence and operation of any trust company formed prior to the effective date of this act shall not be impaired by the enactment of this act.”

Acts 1996, ch. 768, which amended this section, is known and may be cited as the Bank Reform Act of 1996.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Banks and Banking, § 5.

45-2-216. Forfeiture of charter for failure to obtain certificate of authority or to commence business — Restitution of improper expenditures.

If no application for a certificate of authority is filed within six (6) months following the grant of a charter or any additional period allowed by the commissioner, or if a certificate of authority has been finally denied, or if the bank fails to commence business within six (6) months after the issuance of a certificate of authority or any additional period allowed by the commissioner, the charter shall be forfeited, and the bank shall be liquidated in accordance with the orders of the commissioner. If an improper expenditure has been made, the commissioner may order the persons who were incorporators or directors at the time to restore the sum by equal contributions.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.312); 1973, ch. 294, § 6; T.C.A., § 45-216.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Banks and Banking, § 7.

45-2-217. Operation before receiving certificate of authority prohibited.

It is a criminal offense against this chapter and chapter 1 of this title for a state bank to perform any act other than to perfect its organization, obtain and equip a place of business and otherwise prepare to do business before receiving a certificate of authority to operate.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.312); T.C.A., § 45-217.

Code Commission Notes.

Pursuant to §39-11-111, when the performance or nonperformance of any act is made criminal by statute, and no penalty, punishment or forfeiture for the violation of that statute is imposed, the doing of the act is a misdemeanor. The criminal offense in this section has been designated as a Class A misdemeanor by authority of §40-35-110, which provides that an offense designated a misdemeanor without specification as to category is a Class A misdemeanor. See also §39-11-114.

Cross-References. Violation of banking laws, title 45, ch. 2, part 17.

45-2-218. Charter amendment.

A state bank shall apply to the commissioner to amend its charter or to change its location or the location of any of its branches. The change of location shall be consistent with § 45-2-614.

An application for an amendment of the charter shall be authorized by the vote of at least a majority of the outstanding voting stock at a meeting of stockholders except as provided by § 48-20-102(1)-(7).

Notice of the application shall be sent to the persons and organizations that the commissioner may require.

In making a determination, the commissioner shall consider whether the public convenience and advantage would be served by granting the application and shall be guided by the standards prescribed for the approval of an application for a charter, insofar as they are reasonably applicable.

Any amendment to the charter of an incorporated bank increasing or decreasing its capital stock or otherwise must be recorded in accordance with § 45-2-205(c).

Any other provision of the law to the contrary notwithstanding, any bank that was exercising fiduciary powers on April 2, 1969, may continue to exercise the powers without changing any provisions of its charter.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the name, address, and zip code of each incorporator does not need to be set forth in a restated charter.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.313); 1971, ch. 343, § 1; 1971, ch. 433, § 1; 1973, ch. 294, § 6; T.C.A., § 45-218; Acts 1994, ch. 551, § 8; 2001, ch. 54, § 10; 2020, ch. 605, § 4.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment added (g).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 605, § 10. March 20, 2020.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Banks and Banking, § 6.

45-2-219. Charter null and void on ceasing business — Definition.

Any charter issued under this chapter shall be null and void if an institution that is chartered and commences business ceases to conduct business and no business is conducted for a period of two (2) years. For the purposes of this section, “business” means:

Receiving deposits, paying out money on checks and making loans; or

Acting as a fiduciary for the purposes of a trust company.

Acts 1999, ch. 112, § 5.

45-2-220. Organization as a limited liability company — Rules and regulations — Applicability of limited liability company laws.

Subject to the requirements and restrictions of this chapter, including, but not limited to, deposit insurance requirements where applicable, a bank or trust company may organize as a limited liability company pursuant to title 48, chapters 201-249.

The department shall have the authority to promulgate rules and regulations specifying the conditions under which a bank or trust company may organize as a limited liability company.

To the extent title 48, chapters 201-249 is consistent with and not in conflict with this chapter and the rules and regulations of the department, title 48, chapters 201-249 shall apply to a bank or trust company that has organized as a limited liability company.

Acts 2006, ch. 660, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006, ch. 660, § 6 provided that the act shall not apply to any notice of intention filed on or after May 12, 2006.